Nevada, session 83, SB230.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 445B.770 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
445B.770 1. In any county whose population is 100,000 or
more, the Commission shall, in cooperation with the Department of
Motor Vehicles and any local air pollution control agency, adopt
regulations for the control of emissions from motor vehicles in areas
of the county designated by the Commission.
2. In any county whose population is less than 100,000, if the
Commission determines that it is feasible and practicable to carry
out a program of inspecting and testing motor vehicles and systems
for the control of emissions from motor vehicles, and if carrying out
the program is deemed necessary to achieve or maintain the
prescribed standards for the quality of ambient air in areas of the
State designated by the Commission, the Commission shall, in
cooperation with the Department of Motor Vehicles and any local
air pollution control agency established under NRS 445B.500 which
has jurisdiction in a designated area, adopt regulations and
transportation controls as may be necessary to carry out the
program.
3. The regulations [must distinguish] :
(a) Must:
(1) Distinguish between light-duty and heavy-duty motor
vehicles ; and [may]
(2) Provide for the biennial inspection and testing of motor
vehicles and systems for the control of emissions from motor
vehicles in areas designated by the Commission pursuant to this
section; and
(b) May prescribe:
[(a)] (1) Appropriate criteria and procedures for the approval,
installation and use of devices for the control of emissions from
motor vehicles; and
[(b)] (2) Requirements for the proper maintenance of such
devices and motor vehicles.
4. The regulations must establish:
(a) Requirements by which the Department of Motor Vehicles
shall license authorized stations to inspect, repair, adjust and install
devices for the control of emissions for motor vehicles, including
criteria by which any person may become qualified to inspect,
repair, adjust and install those devices.
(b) Requirements by which the Department of Motor Vehicles
may license an owner or lessee of a fleet of three or more vehicles
as a fleet station if the owner or lessee complies with the regulations
-
*SB230*

– 3 –
of the Commission. The fleet station shall only certify vehicles
which constitute that fleet.
(c) Requirements by which the Department of Motor Vehicles
provides for inspections of motor vehicles owned by this State and
any of its political subdivisions.
5. The Commission shall consider, before adopting any
regulation or establishing any criteria pursuant to subparagraph (1)
of paragraph [(a)] (b) of subsection 3:
(a) The availability of devices adaptable to specific makes,
models and years of motor vehicles.
(b) The effectiveness of those devices for reducing the emission
of each type of air pollutant under conditions in this State.
(c) The capability of those devices for reducing any particular
type or types of pollutants without significantly increasing the
emission of any other type or types of pollutant.
(d) The capacity of any manufacturer to produce and distribute
the particular device in such quantities and at such times as will
meet the estimated needs in Nevada.
(e) The reasonableness of the retail cost of the device and the
cost of its installation and maintenance over the life of the device
and the motor vehicle.
(f) The ease of determining whether any such installed device is
functioning properly.
Sec. 2. NRS 445B.825 is hereby amended to read as follows:
445B.825 1. The Commission may provide for exemption
from the provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815, inclusive, of
designated classes of motor vehicles, including, without limitation,
classes based upon the year of manufacture of motor vehicles.
2. A hybrid electric vehicle, as defined in 40 C.F.R. § 86.1803-
01, is exempt from the provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815,
inclusive, until the model year of the vehicle is 6 years old.
3. A new motor vehicle is exempt from the test conducted
pursuant to NRS 445B.798 and the provisions of NRS 445B.770 to
445B.815, inclusive, until the fourth registration of the motor
vehicle. If the Department of Motor Vehicles conducts a test
pursuant to NRS 445B.798, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall
conduct the test pursuant to NRS 445B.798 to determine whether
the motor vehicle complies with the provisions of NRS 445B.700 to
445B.845, inclusive, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto,
[annually] biennially after the fourth registration of the motor
vehicle.
4. The Commission shall provide for a waiver from the
provisions of NRS 445B.770 to 445B.815, inclusive, if compliance
involves repair and equipment costs which exceed the limits
established by the Commission. The Commission shall establish the
-
*SB230*

– 4 –
limits in a manner which avoids unnecessary financial hardship to
motor vehicle owners.
5. As used in this section, “new motor vehicle” means a motor
vehicle that has never been registered with the Department of Motor
Vehicles and has never been registered with the appropriate agency
or authority of any other state, the District of Columbia, any
territory or possession of the United States or a foreign state,
province or country.
H
-
*SB230*